Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control
§ 67-1-91.
Enforcement.

It is hereby made the duty of every police and peace officer and every district and county attorney and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the State Tax Commission to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to inform against and diligently prosecute persons whom they have reasonable cause to believe to be offenders against the provisions thereof. Every such officer refusing or neglecting to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and the court, in addition to imposing the penalty therefor, shall adjudge forfeiture of his office.

In any county or municipality where it is readily apparent that local law enforcement authorities in cooperation with the agents and inspectors provided by the commission cannot control the illegal sale of alcoholic beverages, the commission shall request such assistance as it may deem necessary from the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; and it shall be the duty of the Governor of the State of Mississippi to see that the laws of the state are properly enforced by use of the additional authority as herein provided.

The officers, agents and representatives of the State Tax Commission and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division thereof are authorized and directed to strictly enforce the prohibition laws throughout the state, except in those counties and municipalities which have voted for the legalized sale of intoxicating liquor. The State Highway Patrol, sheriffs, police departments, constables, and all peace officers, and prosecuting attorneys, the Attorney General’s office, district attorneys, county attorneys, city attorneys, and all others charged with upholding the law, as well as the citizenry of this state, are hereby urged and directed to uphold the dignity of the law, to foster public respect therefor and to strictly enforce the laws against intoxicating liquor in all cases while operating a motor vehicle on the streets and highways of this state, and to enforce the law and prosecute against the wrongful use of intoxicating liquor in any county or municipality by a permit holder or licensee or anyone else under such circumstances and conditions as would lead to a breakdown in public law or is violative of the public sense of common decency, as well as to enforce the law against gambling, organized crime, or social vice and corruption.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10265-03, 10265-11, 10265-37; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, §§ 3, 11, 37; Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1990).

§ 67-1-93.
Petition for forfeiture of property other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials; service upon owner, secured or interested party; compliance with procedures.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 67-1-99, when any property, other than an alcoholic beverage or raw material, is seized under this chapter or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, proceedings under this section shall be instituted promptly.

A petition for forfeiture shall be filed promptly in the name of the State of Mississippi with the clerk of the circuit or county court of the county in which the seizure is made. A copy of such petition shall be served upon the following persons by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases:

The owner of the property, if address is known;

Any secured party who has registered his lien or filed a financing statement as provided by law, if the identity of such secured party can be ascertained by the agent or agency which seized the property making a good faith effort to ascertain the identity of such secured party as described in subsections (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of this section;

Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest of whom the agent or agency has actual knowledge; and

Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized.

If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle has been titled, the agent or agency shall make inquiry of the State Tax Commission as to what the records of the State Tax Commission show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest which affects the vehicle.

If the property is a motor vehicle and is not titled in the State of Mississippi then the agent or agency shall attempt to ascertain the name and address of the person in whose name the vehicle is licensed, and if the vehicle is licensed in a state which has in effect a certificate of title law, the agent or agency shall make inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state to determine through such agency’s records the name of the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest or other instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the vehicle.

If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is required by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security interest affecting the property and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that a financing statement covering the security interest has been filed under the laws of this state, the agent or agency shall make inquiry of the appropriate office designated in Section 75-9-501 to determine through the records of such office the name of the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, has filed a financing statement affecting the property.

If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the agent or agency shall make inquiry of the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration to determine through records of the administrator the name of the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in the name of a security device which affects the property.

In the case of all other property other than an alcoholic beverage or raw material subject to forfeiture, if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the agent or agency shall make a good faith inquiry to identify the holder of any such instrument.

In the event the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when it was seized, or states that any person holds any lien, security interest or other interest in the nature of a security interest which affects the property, the agent or agency shall cause any record owner and also any lienholder, secured party or other person who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest which affects the property to be named in the petition of forfeiture and to be served with process in the same manner as in civil cases.

If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a copy of the petition of forfeiture, or if no person was in possession of the property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the property is unknown, the agent or agency shall file with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to “the Unknown Owner of_______________ ,” filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed description of the property subject to forfeiture. Service by publication shall be made in accordance with the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

No proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section has been complied with. Any answer received from an inquiry required by subsections (3) through (7) of this section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 424, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 117; Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 26, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2002.

§ 67-1-95.
Owner’s verified answer; forfeiture hearing; burden of proof; rights of holders of security interests, liens, or other interests; disposition of property.

An owner of property seized, other than an owner of alcoholic beverages or raw materials, shall file a verified answer within twenty (20) days after the completion of service of process. If no answer is filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the property to the agency which seized the property. If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty (30) days of filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court if court would not be in progress within thirty (30) days after filing the answer. Provided, however, that upon request by the agent or agency, or the owner of the property, the court may postpone the forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending against such owner.

If the owner of the property has filed a verified answer denying that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the state to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture; however, if no answer had been filed by the owner of the property, the petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and shall be prima facie evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture.

At the hearing any claimant of any right, title or interest in the property may prove his lien, security interest or other interest in the nature of a security interest, to be bona fide and created without knowledge or consent that the property was to be used so as to cause the property to be subject to forfeiture.

If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the judge shall forfeit the property to the agency which seized the property. If proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall order the property released to him. If such interest is less than the present value of the property and if the proof shows that the property is subject to forfeiture the court shall order the property forfeited to the agency.

Upon a petition filed in the name of the state of Mississippi with the clerk of the circuit or county court of the county in which the seizure is made, the court having jurisdiction may order the property summarily forfeited except when lawful possession and title can be ascertained. If a person is found to have had lawful possession and title prior to seizure, the court shall order the property returned to the owner, if the owner so desires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 424, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1984).

§ 67-1-97.
Public auction of forfeited property other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials; disbursement of proceeds.

All property other than alcoholic beverages or raw materials that have been forfeited shall be sold at a public auction for cash by the agency which seized such property to the highest and best bidder after advertising the sale for at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last notice to appear not more than ten (10) days nor less than five (5) days prior to such sale, in a newspaper having a general circulation throughout the state of Mississippi. Such notices shall contain a description of the property to be sold and a statement of the time and place of the sale. It shall not be necessary to the validity of such sale either to have the property present at the place of the sale or to have the name of the owner thereof stated in such notice. The proceeds of the sale shall be delivered to the court clerk and shall be disposed of as follows:

To any bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and

The balance, if any, after deduction of all storage and court costs, shall be forwarded to the state treasurer and deposited with and used as general funds of the state.

Any county or municipal law enforcement agency which seizes property, other than alcoholic beverages or raw materials, may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes all such property that has been forfeited if it is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest. Such county or municipal law enforcement agency may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest so that the property can be released for its use. If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law, the law enforcement agency shall be deemed to be the purchaser, and the certificate of title shall be issued to it as required by subsection (4) of this section.

All other property that a county or municipal law enforcement agency seizes, other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials, and other than property which such law enforcement agency retains for use and operation for official purposes, shall, upon its forfeiture, be sold by such law enforcement agency in the same manner and subject to the same procedure for the sale of such property as provided for in subsection (1) of this section; however, the proceeds of such sale shall be delivered to the clerk of the county or municipality for disposal in the following manner:

To any bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and

The balance, if any, after deduction of all storage and court costs, shall be forwarded to the clerk of the county or municipality, as the case may be, and deposited with and used as general funds of the county or municipality.

All other agencies which have seized all such property other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes all property that has been forfeited to them if such property is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest. In such case, the agency may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest so that the property can be released for use by such agency.

Such agency may maintain, repair, use and operate the property with money appropriated for current operations. If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law, such agency is deemed to be the purchaser and the certificate of title shall be issued to it as required by subsection (4) of this section.

The State Tax Commission shall issue a certificate of title to any person who purchases property under the provisions of this section when a certificate of title is required under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 424, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1984).

§ 67-1-99.
Administrative forfeiture of certain property.

Property subject to forfeiture, other than alcoholic beverages or raw materials, as described by Section 67-1-17 and having a value of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) or less may be forfeited by the administrative forfeiture procedures provided for in this section.

The seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice of intention to forfeit the seized property administratively, by certified mail, return receipt required, to all persons who are required to be notified pursuant to Section 67-1-93.

In the event that notice of administrative forfeiture cannot be given as provided in subsection (2) of this section because of refusal, failure to claim, insufficient address or any other reason the seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the seizure took place once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

Notice pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall include the following information:

A description of the property;

The approximate value of the property;

The date and place of the seizure;

The connection between the property and the violation of the Local Option ABC Laws or Chapter 31, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972;

The instructions for filing a request for judicial review; and

A statement that the property will be forfeited to the seizing law enforcement agency if a request for judicial review is not timely filed.

Persons claiming an interest in the seized property may initiate judicial review of the seizure and proposed forfeiture by filing a written request for judicial review with the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing law enforcement agency within thirty (30) days after receipt of the certified letter or within thirty (30) days after the first publication of notice, whichever is applicable.

If no request for judicial review is timely filed, the seizing law enforcement agency shall prepare a written declaration of forfeiture of the subject property and the forfeited property shall be used, disposed of, or distributed in accordance with the provision of Section 67-1-97.

Upon receipt of a timely request for judicial review, the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly file a petition for forfeiture and proceed as provided in Section 67-1-93.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 451, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 67-1-101.
Governing authorities of certain municipalities authorized to establish and/or modify leisure and recreation districts.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings ascribed in this section, unless the context clearly otherwise requires:

“Municipality” means any incorporated city, town or village that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law or is in a county that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law

“Leisure and recreation district” means an area officially designated by ordinance or resolution of the governing authorities of a municipality or county as a leisure and recreation district.

“County” means any county that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law.

Subject to the provisions of this section, the governing authorities of a municipality, by ordinance, may establish one or more leisure and recreation districts within the corporate boundaries of the municipality and designate the geographic area or areas to be included within a district. The governing authorities of a municipality, by ordinance, may modify the boundaries of a leisure and recreation district. In addition, the boundaries of a leisure and recreation district may extend from within the municipality into the unincorporated area of the county in which the municipality is located if the county consents to the extension and has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law.

Subject to the provisions of this section, the board of Supervisors of a county, by resolution, may establish one or more leisure and recreation districts within the county that are outside the corporate limits of any municipality in the county and designate the geographic area or areas to be included within the districts.

The designation or modification of the geographic area or areas as a leisure and recreation district shall include a detailed description of the area or areas within the district, boundaries of the district and a georeferenced map of the district. In addition to any other matters addressed in an ordinance or resolution establishing or modifying a leisure and recreation district, a municipality or county, as the case may be, must describe the manner in which the municipality or county, as the case may be, will provide for adequate law enforcement and other public safety measures and services within the district. Following the establishment and/or modification of a leisure and recreation district, the municipality or county, as the case may be, shall provide the Department of Revenue with (i) a copy of any ordinance or resolution relating to the establishment or modification of the district, (ii) verification from the municipal police department and/or applicable sheriff’s department indicating how such department will provide adequate law enforcement and other public safety measures and services within the district, and (iii) a list of persons or other entities that hold permits issued under Section 67-1-51(c), (e), (f), (g), (l), (n) or (o) and are located and/or doing business under such permits in the district at the time the district is established.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.